Maine, session 132, LD1108.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4041, sub-§1-A, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 559, Pt. CC,
§5, is amended to read:
A. The department shall:
(1) Develop a rehabilitation and reunification plan as provided in this
subparagraph.
(a) In developing the rehabilitation and reunification plan, the department shall
make good faith efforts to seek the participation of the parent. Information that
must be included in developing the plan includes the problems that present a
risk of harm to the child, the services needed to address those problems,
provisions to ensure the safety of the child while the parent engages in services,
a means to measure the extent to which progress has been made, and visitation
that protects the child's physical and emotional well-being. With this
information, the department shall prepare a written rehabilitation and
reunification plan.
(b) The department shall circulate the plan to the parties at least 10 days before
a scheduled court hearing and shall present the plan to the court for filing at
that hearing.
(c) The rehabilitation and reunification plan must include the following:
(i) The reasons for the removal of the child from home;
(ii) The changes that are necessary to eliminate jeopardy to the child while
in the care of a parent;
(iii) Rehabilitation services that will be provided and must be completed
satisfactorily prior to the child's returning home;
(iv) Services that must be provided or made available to assist the parent
in rehabilitating and reunifying with the child, as appropriate to the child
and family, including, but not limited to, reasonable transportation for the
parent for visits and services, child care, housing assistance, assistance
with transportation to and from required services and other services that
support reunification;
(v) A schedule of and conditions for visits between the child and the parent
designed to provide the parent and child time together in settings that
provide as positive a parent-child interaction as can practicably be
achieved while ensuring the emotional and physical well-being of the child
when visits are not detrimental to the child's best interests;
(vi) Any use of kinship support, including, but not limited to, placement,
supervision of visitation, in-home support or respite care;
(vii) A reasonable time schedule for proposed reunification, reasonably
calculated to meet the child's needs; and
(viii) A statement of the financial responsibilities of the parent and the
department during the reunification process; and
Page 1 - 132LR1530(01)

(ix) If the parent is in treatment for substance use disorder, a plan for
random screening of the parent for illegal drugs;
(2) Provide the parent with prompt written notice of the following, unless that
notice would be detrimental to the best interests of the child:
(a) The child's residence and, when practicable, at least 7 days' advance written
notice of a planned change of residence; and
(b) Any serious injuries, major medical care received or hospitalization of the
child;
(3) Make good faith efforts to cooperate with the parent in the pursuit of the plan
and schedule meetings so as to allow for the attendance of the parent to the extent
possible;
(4) Periodically review with the parent the progress of the plan, including the
parent's compliance in accessing services included in the plan, and make any
appropriate changes in that plan. If the parties disagree about the proposed changes
in the plan, any party may seek an informal conference with all other parties in an
effort to resolve the disagreement, prior to initiating court action. If the parties are
unable to agree after an informal conference, the parties may have access to the
court's case management system. This subparagraph may not be construed to limit
the court's authority to manage and control any cases within the court;
(5) Petition for judicial review and return of custody of the child to the parent at
the earliest appropriate time, but no earlier than 6 months following removal of the
child from the parent's home; and
(6) Petition for termination of parental rights at the earliest possible time that it is
determined that family reunification efforts will be discontinued pursuant to
subsection 2 and that termination is in the best interests of the child.;
(7) If the parent is in treatment for substance use disorder, conduct random
screening of the parent for illegal drugs; and
(8) Conduct unscheduled home visits with the parent.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4041, sub-§1-A, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 559, Pt. CC,
§5, is amended by amending subparagraph (8) to read:
(8) Make good faith efforts to cooperate with the department in developing and
pursuing the plan, including by attending meetings with the department.